Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 1. The Insurance Contract.

Sec. 21.42.010.
Applicability.

AS

21.42.010

—

21.42.599

do not apply to

reinsurance;

policies or contracts not issued for delivery in this state or delivered in this state, except as provided in AS

21.42.120

;

wet marine and transportation insurance;

title insurance, except that AS

21.42.080

,

21.42.120

,

21.42.130

,

21.42.180

,

21.42.190

and

21.42.230

do apply.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Revisor’s notes. —

In the introductory language of this section, in 2006, “AS

21.42.010

—

21.42.500

do not” was substituted for “this chapter does not” to reflect the addition of AS

21.42.700

—

21.42.705

to this chapter by § 1, ch. 39, SLA 2006. In 2010, in the introductory language, “AS

21.42.010

—

21.42.599

” was substituted for “AS 21.42.010 —

21.42.500

” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS 21.42.500.

Sec. 21.42.020.
Insurable interest: life, annuity, or health.

A person of competent legal capacity may procure or effect an insurance contract on the life or body of the person for the benefit of any person. A person may not procure or cause to be procured an insurance contract upon the life or body of another person unless the benefits under the contract are payable to the individual insured, the personal representatives of the individual insured, or to a person having, at the time the contract was made, an insurable interest in the individual insured.

If the beneficiary, assignee, or other payee under a contract made in violation of this section receives from the insurer any benefits from the contract upon the death, disablement, or injury of the person insured, the person insured or the executor or administrator of the person insured may maintain an action to recover the benefits from the person receiving them.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, a charitable organization may obtain, by procurement, assignment, or otherwise, life or health insurance on an insured who consents to the issuance of the insurance. In this subsection, “charitable organization” means a charity that is exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) (Internal Revenue Code).

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a trustee, acting in a fiduciary capacity, may procure or cause to be procured an insurance contract that is on the life or body of an individual and under which the proceeds of the insurance contract are payable to the trustee, acting in a fiduciary capacity, if

the trustee, acting in a fiduciary capacity, owns the insurance contract or the trust itself owns the insurance contract;

on the date the contract is made, a settlor of the trust is the individual insured, has an insurable interest in the individual insured, or would have had an insurable interest in the individual insured if the settlor were living at the time the contract was made; in this paragraph, “settlor” means a person, including a person for whom a fiduciary or agent is acting, who executes the trust instrument; and

the proceeds of the contract are primarily for the benefit of a trust beneficiary who has an insurable interest in the individual insured, except that, if the determination of the trust beneficiary’s insurable interest is based on (e)(1) of this section, the trust beneficiary’s relation by blood or law must be within the third degree.

“Insurable interest,” with reference to life, annuity, or health insurance, includes only the following interests:

in the case of persons related closely by blood or by law, a substantial interest engendered by love and affection;

in the case of persons other than those described in (1) of this subsection, a lawful and substantial economic interest in having the life, health, or bodily safety of the person insured continue, as distinguished from an interest that would arise only by, or would be enhanced in value by, the death, disablement, or injury of the individual insured;

an individual party to a contract or option for the purchase or sale of an interest in a business partnership or firm, or of shares of stock of a closed corporation or of an interest in the shares, has an insurable interest in the life of each individual party to the contract for the purposes of the contract only, in addition to an insurable interest that may otherwise exist as to the life of the individual.

A person who has an insurable interest in the life or body of an individual may form a business firm that is substantially or solely for the purpose of purchasing, holding, or administering an insurance contract on the life or body of the individual. In this subsection, “firm” has the meaning given in AS

21.97.900

, but also includes a business trust and a joint venture.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 9 SLA 1992; am § 36 ch 56 SLA 1996; am § 35 ch 38 SLA 2002; am § 37 ch 45 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (c) enacted as (d) [now (e)].
Relettered in 1992, at which time former subsection (c) was relettered as (d).

Subsection (d) was enacted as (e) and relettered in 2013, at which time former subsection (d) was relettered as (e).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective September 9, 2013, added (e) [now (d)] and (f).

Collateral references. —

43 Am. Jur. 2d, Insurance, §§ 543-549.

44 C.J.S., Insurance, §§ 11-17.

Validity of assignment of life insurance policy to one who has no insurable interest in insured. 30 A.L.R.2d 1310.

Insurable interest of partner or partnership in life of partner. 70 ALR2d 577.

Insurable interest of brother or sister in life of sibling. 60 ALR3d 98.

Estoppel of, or waiver by, issuer of life insurance policy to assert defense of lack of insurable interest. 86 ALR4th 828.

Sec. 21.42.030.
Insurable interest: property.

A contract of insurance of property or of an interest in property or arising from property may not be enforced as to the insurance except for the benefit of persons having an insurable interest in the things insured at the time of the loss.

The measure of an insurable interest in property is the extent to which the insured might be indemnified by loss, injury, or impairment.

In this section, “insurable interest” means an actual, lawful, and substantial economic interest in the safety or preservation of the subject of the insurance free from loss, destruction, or pecuniary damage or impairment.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (b) was formerly (c) and present (c) was formerly (b).
Relettered in 1984.

Sec. 21.42.040.
Interest of named insured.

When the name of the person insured is specified in a policy insuring property the insurance can be applied only to the proper interest of the person insured.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.42.050.
Change of interest on death.

A change of interest, by will or succession, on the death of the insured does not avoid an insurance of property and the insurance passes to the person taking an interest in the thing insured.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.42.060.
Transfer of interest between joint insureds.

A transfer of interest by one of the several partners, joint owners, or owners in common, who are jointly insured, to the others, does not avoid an insurance of property even though it has been agreed that the insurance shall cease upon an alienation of the thing insured.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.42.070.
Insurance without interest, or of wager, is void.

A stipulation in a policy of insurance of property for the payment of loss without regard to absence of an insurable interest in the property on the part of the insured, or that the policy shall be received as proof of the interest, is void.

A policy executed by way of gaming or wagering is void.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.42.075.
Reimbursement of losses.

An insurer may make a filing for approval by the director that provides for reimbursement by an insured of losses paid by the insurer under a workers’ compensation insurance policy.
A form that alters the obligation of the insurer to an employee under AS

23.30.025

or

23.30.030

may not be approved by the director.
Filing for approval under this section is not a deviation under AS

21.39.070

.

History.

(§ 25 ch 93 SLA 1982)

Sec. 21.42.080.
Capacity to contract.

A person of competent legal capacity may contract for insurance.

[Repealed, § 25 ch 245 SLA 1970.]

[Repealed, § 25 ch 245 SLA 1970.]

[Repealed, § 25 ch 245 SLA 1970.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 25 ch 245 SLA 1970)

Sec. 21.42.090.
Application required, life and health insurance.

A life or health insurance contract upon an individual, except a contract of group life insurance or of group or blanket health insurance, may not be made or effectuated unless at the time of the making of the contract the individual insured, being of competent legal capacity to contract, applies for the contract or has consented to it in writing, except in the following cases:

a spouse may effectuate the insurance upon the other spouse;

a person having an insurable interest in the life of a minor or a person upon whom a minor is dependent for support and maintenance, may effectuate insurance upon the life of or pertaining to the minor;

family policies insuring any two or more members of a family may be issued on an application signed by either parent, a stepparent, or by a husband or wife.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 37 ch 56 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For health insurance marketed as medicare supplements, see 3 AAC 28, art. 5.

Collateral references. —

43 Am. Jur. 2d, Insurance, §§ 199 to 206.

44 C.J.S., Insurance, §§ 273-280, 307.

Liability of insurer for damages resulting from delay in passing upon application for health insurance. 18 ALR4th 1115.

Sec. 21.42.100.
Request for copy of application; alteration.

If a policy of life or health insurance delivered in this state is reinstated or renewed, and the insured or the beneficiary or assignee of the policy makes written request to the insurer for a copy of the application, if any, for the reinstatement or renewal, the insurer shall, within 30 days after receipt of the request at its home office or at one of its branch offices, deliver, or mail to the person making the request a copy of the application. In the case of a request from a beneficiary, the time within which the insurer is required to furnish a copy of the application does not begin to run until after receipt of evidence satisfactory to the insurer of the beneficiary’s vested interest in the policy or contract.

An alteration of a written application for a life or health insurance policy may not be made by a person other than the applicant without the written consent of the applicant, except that insertions may be made by the insurer, for administrative purposes only, in a manner that indicates clearly that the insertions are not to be ascribed to the applicant.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 38 ch 56 SLA 1996)

Sec. 21.42.110.
Representations in applications.

All statements and descriptions in an application for an insurance policy or annuity contract, or in negotiations for the policy or contract, by or in behalf of the insured or annuitant, shall be considered to be representations and not warranties. Misrepresentations, omissions, concealment of facts, and incorrect statements may not prevent a recovery under the policy or contract unless either

fraudulent;

material either to the acceptance of the risk, or to the hazard assumed by the insurer; or

the insurer in good faith would either not have issued the policy or contract, or would not have issued a policy or contract in as large an amount, or at the same premium or rate, or would not have provided coverage with respect to the hazard resulting in the loss, if the true facts had been made known to the insurer as required either by the application for the policy or contract or otherwise.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.42.120.
Filing, approval of forms.

A basic insurance policy or annuity contract form, or application form where written application is required and is to be made a part of the policy or contract, or printed rider or endorsement form or form of renewal certificate, may not be delivered, or issued for delivery in this state, unless the form has been filed with and approved by the director. This provision does not apply to surety bonds or to specially rated inland marine risks, nor to policies, riders, endorsements, or forms of unique character designed for and used with relation to insurance upon a particular subject, or that relate to the manner of distribution of benefits or to the reservation of rights and benefits under life or health insurance policies and are used at the request of the individual policyholder, contract holder, or certificate holder; or to policies of commercial insurance that the director has authorized under (d) of this section to be filed on or before the date of use and that are not subject to the prior approval of the director. The filing required by this section of forms for use in property, marine other than wet marine and transportation coverages, casualty, and surety coverages may be made by a rating organization on behalf of its members and subscribers; but this provision does not prohibit a member or subscriber from filing the forms on its own behalf.

Each insurer or rating organization shall submit a filing under one of the following procedures, clearly specifying the filing procedure under which the filing is being made:

for prior approval under AS

21.42.123

; or

for file and use under AS

21.42.125

.

An order of the director disapproving the form or withdrawing a previous approval shall state the grounds and the particulars in such detail as reasonably to inform the insurer thereof.

The director may, by order, require that a form or document be filed for informational purposes or may exempt a form or document from the requirements of this section for a time determined by the director when, in the opinion of the director, this section may not practicably be applied, or the filing or approval of the form or document is, in the opinion of the director, not desirable or necessary for the protection of the public.

This section applies to a form used by domestic insurers for delivery in a jurisdiction outside this state, if the insurance supervisory official of that jurisdiction informs the director that the form is not subject to approval or disapproval by the official, and upon the director’s order requiring the form to be submitted for review and approval under this section. The applicable same standards shall apply to these forms as apply to forms for domestic use.

This section does not apply to a type of insurance subject to AS 21.57 or to policies issued under AS 21.34.

An insurer who has submitted an application for a certificate of authority under AS

21.09.110

may file a proposed policy form as described in this section. The director’s approval of the policy form is contingent upon the issuance of a certificate of authority under AS

21.09.120

.

The director may adopt regulations detailing the format and content of the filing of a policy form under this section.

The director may by order require an insurance document, form, or type of insurance document or form as specified in the order, to be submitted for prior approval if, in the opinion of the director, the approval of the insurance document, form, or type of insurance document or form is necessary for the protection of the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 72 ch 62 SLA 1995; am § 39 ch 56 SLA 1996; am §§ 77, 78 ch 81 SLA 2001; am § 43 ch 96 SLA 2004; am §§ 9, 10 ch 88 SLA 2005; am § 17 ch 30 SLA 2009)

Administrative Code. —

For coverage for attorney fees taxable as costs against an insured according to Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 82, see 3 AAC 26, art. 3.

For health insurance marketed as medicare supplements, see 3 AAC 28, art. 5.

For life insurance policy illustrations, see 3 AAC 28, art. 9.

For information filings for commercial insurance, see 3 AAC 29, art. 6.

For premium installment payments, see 3 AAC 30, art. 2.

For filing procedure for forms, rates, manuals, rating plans, and rules, see 3 AAC 31, art. 2.

Sec. 21.42.123.
Form filing subject to prior approval.

A prior approval filing shall be made not less than 30 days before the effective date. At the end of the 30-day period, the form filed shall be considered approved unless, before the end of the 30-day period, it has been affirmatively disapproved by the director. Approval of the form by the director before the end of the 30-day period constitutes a waiver of the unexpired portion of the waiting period. The director may extend by not more than an additional 30 days the period for approving or disapproving the form, by giving notice of the extension during the initial 30-day period. At the expiration of the extended period, and in the absence of a prior approval or disapproval, the form shall be considered approved. The director may, by order, at any time after the notice, and for cause shown, withdraw the approval.

The director may require the insurer or rating organization to revise the filing to comply with this title. Failure of the insurer or rating organization to provide the information within 30 days after the director’s request, or an extension of the period by the director for an additional 15 days upon written request of the insurer or rating organization within the response period, is considered to be a request by the insurer or rating organization to withdraw the filing from further consideration.

The filing must state an effective date. In place of a specific date, the insurer or rating organization may specify a reasonable time period after approval for the filing to be effective.

A prior approval filing shall be open to public inspection after the filing becomes effective.

History.

(§ 11 ch 88 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For filing procedure for forms, rates, manuals, rating plans, and rules, see 3 AAC 31, art. 2.

Sec. 21.42.125.
Form filing subject to file and use; penalties.

A file and use filing shall be filed with the director for a waiting period of not less than 30 days. The period may be extended by the director or the insurer or rating organization for an additional 30 days if notice is given within the initial 30-day period that additional time is needed for the consideration of the filing. The filing may become effective at the end of the waiting period unless disapproved by the director before the expiration of the waiting period.

The filing must state an effective date that must be after the waiting period. Upon written notice by the insurer or rating organization, the director may authorize a filing that has been reviewed to become effective before the expiration of the waiting period.

A file and use form filing must include a signed compliance certificate certifying that the filing complies with this title. An authorized officer or state filings manager of the insurer shall sign the compliance certificate stating that, to the best of the individual’s knowledge, the filing complies with this title. The director may issue an order requiring an insurer who submits an incomplete or inaccurate compliance certificate to submit future form filings for prior approval. The order must specify the conditions under which the insurer may again submit filings under this section. In addition to any other penalty provided by law, a person that the director finds has submitted a materially false or misleading compliance certificate may be subject to either a civil penalty of not more than $10,000 for each violation or a civil penalty of not more than $25,000 for each violation if the director finds that the person knowingly violated the provisions of this title. A filing that does not include the signed compliance certificate shall be reviewed under the prior approval procedure under AS

21.42.123

. In this subsection, “knowingly” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

.

The director may require an insurer or rating organization to provide additional information to demonstrate that a file and use filing meets the requirements of this title or to revise the filing to meet the requirements of this title. If an insurer or rating organization fails to provide the information within the waiting period described in (a) of this section, the director shall consider the failure to be a request to withdraw the filing from further consideration.

A file and use filing shall be open to public inspection after the filing becomes effective.

History.

(§ 11 ch 88 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For filing procedure for forms, rates, manuals, rating plans, and rules, see 3 AAC 31, art. 2.

Sec. 21.42.130.
Grounds for disapproval.

The director shall disapprove a form filed under AS

21.42.120

or withdraw a previous approval of the form only if the form

is in any respect in violation of or does not comply with this title;

contains or incorporates by reference, where incorporation is permissible, an inconsistent, ambiguous, or misleading clause, or exception and condition that deceptively affects the risk purported to be assumed in the general coverage of the contract;

has a title, heading, or other indication of its provisions that is misleading;

is printed or otherwise reproduced in a manner that renders a provision of the form substantially illegible;

provides benefits for Medicare supplement insurance that are unreasonable in relation to the premium charged.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 45 SLA 1981; am § 40 ch 56 SLA 1996; am § 40 ch 81 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For coverage for attorney fees taxable as costs against an insured according to Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 82, see 3 AAC 26, art. 4.

For health insurance marketed as medicare supplements, see 3 AAC 28, art. 5.

For life insurance policy illustrations, see 3 AAC 28, art. 9.

Sec. 21.42.140.
Standard provisions.

Insurance contracts must contain the standard or uniform provisions that are required by the applicable provisions of this title pertaining to contracts of particular kinds of insurance. The director may waive the required use of a particular provision in a particular insurance policy form on a determination that

the provision is unnecessary for the protection of the insured and inconsistent with the purposes of the policy; and

the policy is otherwise approved.

A policy may not contain a provision inconsistent with a standard or uniform provision used or required to be used, but the director may approve a substitute provision that the director determines is not less favorable in any particular to the insured or beneficiary than the provisions otherwise required.

In lieu of the provisions required by this title for contracts for particular kinds of insurance, substantially similar provisions required by the law of the domicile of a foreign or alien insurer may be used when approved by the director.

A provision required by this title to be contained in a policy cannot be waived by agreement between the insurer and another person.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.42.145.
Stop-loss insurance provisions.

An insurance company licensed under AS 21.09, a hospital or medical service corporation licensed under AS 21.87, a fraternal benefit society licensed under AS 21.84, a health maintenance organization licensed under AS 21.86, or a multiple employer welfare arrangement may not issue a stop-loss insurance policy that

has an annual attachment point for claims incurred for each individual that is lower than $10,000;

has an annual aggregate attachment point for a small employer that is lower than the greatest of

$4,000 times the number of individuals covered under the health benefit plan;

120 percent of the expected claims for the health benefit plan for the period covered by the stop-loss insurance policy; or

$20,000;

has an annual aggregate attachment point for a large employer that is lower than 110 percent of expected claims for the health benefit plan for the period covered by the stop-loss insurance policy; or

provides direct coverage of health care expenses of an individual.

The director may, by regulation, change the dollar amounts established under (a) of this section to reflect medical costs in this state, including adjustments to reflect changes in the medical care component of the Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers for the Anchorage Metropolitan Area compiled by the Bureau of Labor Statistics, United States Department of Labor.

For the purposes of this section,

“attachment point” means the claim amount incurred by an insured group beyond which the insurer incurs a liability for payment;

“expected claims” means the amount of claims that, in absence of a stop-loss insurance policy or other insurance, are projected to be incurred by an insured group through its health benefit plan;

“health benefit plan” has the meaning given in AS

21.54.500

;

“large employer” has the meaning given in AS

21.54.500

;

“small employer” has the meaning given in AS 21.54.500.

History.

(§ 36 ch 38 SLA 2002)

Sec. 21.42.150.
Policy must contain entire contract.

The policy, when issued, shall contain the entire contract between the parties, and neither the insurer nor its agent or representative, nor a person insured by the policy, may make an agreement as to the insurance that is not expressed in the policy.
This section does not prohibit the modification of a policy, after issuance, by written rider or endorsement issued by the insurer.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.42.160.
Contents of policies in general.

Each policy must specify

the names of the parties of the contract;

the subject of the insurance;

the risks insured against;

the time when the insurance thereunder takes effect and the period during which the insurance is to continue;

the premium;

the conditions pertaining to the insurance.

If under the policy the exact amount of premium is determinable only at stated intervals or termination of the contract, a statement of the basis and rates upon which the premium is to be determined and paid shall be included.

Subsections (a) and (b) of this section do not apply to surety contracts, or to group insurance policies.

Each policy and annuity contract issued by an insurer, and the forms thereof filed with the director, must have printed on them an appropriate designating letter or figure, or combination of letters or figures, or terms identifying the respective forms of policies or contracts. When a change is made in the form, the designating letters, figures, or terms must be correspondingly changed.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 18 ch 30 SLA 2009; am § 38 ch 41 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For coverage for attorney fees taxable as costs against an insured according to Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 82, see 3 AAC 26, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 16, 2016, in (d), deleted “, together with the year of adoption of the form” at the end of the first sentence, in the second sentence deleted “and year of adoption” following “or terms”.

Sec. 21.42.170.
Additional policy contents.

A policy may contain additional provisions not inconsistent with this title that are

required to be inserted by the laws of the insurer’s domicile;

necessary, on account of the manner in which the insurer is constituted or operated, in order to state the rights and obligations of the parties to the contract; or

desired by the insurer and neither prohibited by law nor in conflict with any provisions required to be included in it.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.42.175.
Non-English translations.

The director may approve an insurance policy form in a language other than English if the insurance policy form

is filed with a copy of the same material in English; and

discloses, in both English and the language other than English, that the English language version is the official version and the non-English language version is for informational purposes only.

The English language version of the insurance policy form or associated material shall be the official version for purposes of application and interpretation if the non-English insurance policy form or associated material

is provided with a copy of the same material in English; and

discloses, in both English and the language other than English, that the English language version is the official version and the non-English language version is for informational purposes only.

An insurer may not misrepresent information in an insurance policy form or associated material translated into a language other than English. For purposes of this subsection, “misrepresent information” means to include a statement or omit a statement when, taken in the context of the whole presentation, the statement or omission may tend to mislead or deceive the person or persons addressed.

For purposes of this section, “associated material” means advertising and marketing information including brochures, pamphlets, or electronic media used to describe or promote the insurance policy form.

History.

(§ 1 ch 110 SLA 2006)

Sec. 21.42.180.
Charter, bylaw provisions.

A policy may not contain a provision purporting to make a portion of the charter, bylaws, or other constituent document of the insurer, other than the subscribers’ agreement or power of attorney of a reciprocal insurer, a part of the contract unless the portion is set forth in full in the policy.
A policy provision in violation of this section is invalid.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.42.190.
Execution of policies.

Each insurance policy shall be executed in the name of and on behalf of the insurer by its officer, attorney-in-fact, employee, or representative duly authorized by the insurer.

A facsimile signature of the executing individual may be used in lieu of an original signature.

An insurance contract that is otherwise valid is not rendered invalid by reason of the apparent execution on behalf of the insurer by the imprinted facsimile signature of an individual who is not authorized to execute as of the date of the policy.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.42.200.
Underwriters’ and combination policies.

Two or more authorized insurers may jointly issue, and shall be jointly and severally liable on, an underwriters’ policy bearing their names. Any one insurer may issue policies in the name of an underwriter’s department and the policy must plainly show the true name of the insurer.

Two or more insurers may, with the approval of the director, issue a combination policy which shall contain provisions substantially as follows:

that the insurers executing the policy shall be severally liable for the full amount of loss or damage, according to the terms of the policy, or for specified percentages or amounts thereof, aggregating the full amount of insurance under the policy; and

that service of process, or of notice or proof of loss required by the policy, upon any of the insurers executing the policy, constitutes service upon all the insurers.

This section does not apply to cosurety obligations.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.42.205.
Coordination of benefits.

Unless prohibited by federal law, an insurer authorized under AS 21.09 to offer, issue for delivery, deliver, or renew an individual or group health insurance policy for major medical coverage on an expense incurred basis; a health maintenance organization authorized under AS 21.86 to offer a contract to provide major medical health care services on a prepaid basis; or a service corporation authorized under AS 21.87 to offer or renew an individual or group subscriber’s contract for major medical coverage shall include a coordination of benefits provision in a major medical policy or contract.

The director may adopt regulations to implement this section.

History.

(§ 41 ch 81 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For unfair claims settlement acts or practices, see 3 AAC 26, art. 1.

Sec. 21.42.210.
Interest in reinsurance.

The original insured has no interest in a contract of reinsurance.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.42.220.
Validity of noncomplying forms.

An insurance policy, rider, or endorsement issued and otherwise valid that contains a condition or provision not in compliance with the requirements of this title, is not thereby rendered invalid but shall be construed and applied in accordance with the conditions and provisions as would have applied had the policy, rider, or endorsement been in full compliance with this title.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Administrative Code. —

For premium installment payments, see 3 AAC 30, art. 2.

Sec. 21.42.230.
Construction of policies.

Each insurance contract shall be construed according to the entirety of its terms and conditions as set out in the policy and as amplified, extended, or modified by a rider, endorsement, or application that is a part of the policy.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.42.240.
Binders.

A binder or other contract for temporary insurance may be made orally or in writing and shall be considered to include all the usual terms of the policy as to which the binder was given together with the applicable endorsements designated in the binder, except as superseded by the clear and express terms of the binder.

A binder is not valid after the issuance of the policy with respect to which it was given, or after 90 days from its effective date, whichever period is the shortest.

If the policy has not been issued a binder may be extended or renewed after the 90 days with the written approval of the insurer.

This section does not apply to life or health insurances.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 41 ch 56 SLA 1996)

Sec. 21.42.250.
Delivery or posting of policy; notifications.

An insurer shall provide a policy or endorsement to the insured or to the person entitled to it by mail or delivery or by posting on the insurer’s Internet website under (c) of this section within a reasonable period of time after its issuance. The insurer is not required to mail, deliver, or post the policy or endorsement until all conditions required by the insurer have been met by the insured.

If the original policy is delivered or is required to be delivered to or for deposit with a vendor, mortgagee, or pledgee of a motor vehicle or aircraft, and in which policy an interest of the vendee, mortgagor, or pledgor in or with reference to the vehicle or aircraft is insured, a duplicate of the policy setting out the name and address of the insurer, insurance classification of vehicle or aircraft, type of coverage, limits of liability, premiums for the respective coverages, and duration of the policy or memorandum thereof containing the same information, shall be delivered by the vendor, mortgagee, or pledgee to each vendee, mortgagor, or pledgor named in the policy or coming within the group of persons designated in the policy to be included. If the policy does not provide coverage of legal liability for injury to persons or damage to the property of third parties, a statement of the facts shall be printed, written, or stamped conspicuously on the face of the duplicate policy or memorandum.

An insurer may provide an insurance policy or endorsement by posting the policy or endorsement on the insurer’s Internet website and clearly identifying the posted policy or endorsement purchased by the insured in the declaration page provided to the insured. An insurance policy or endorsement posted under this subsection

must contain the standard or uniform provisions required by AS

21.42.140

;

must be in a form approved by the director under AS

21.42.120

;

must be posted in a manner that reasonably allows the insured to retrieve and print or save the policy or endorsement from the website without paying a fee;

must remain posted on the insurer’s Internet website during the time that the policy or endorsement is in effect, be retained by the insurer for not less than three years after the policy or endorsement is no longer in effect, and be made available to the insured on request; and

may not include personally identifiable information.

The insurer shall notify the insured at the time of issuance or renewal of the method by which the insured may request and the insurer shall provide a paper or electronic copy of the insured’s policy or endorsement without the insured paying a fee.

If the policy or endorsement change or the means of obtaining policy information from the insurer’s Internet website changes, the insurer shall notify the insured in the manner the insurer customarily communicates with an insured.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am §§ 1, 2 ch 18 SLA 2013; am § 39 ch 41 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective August 21, 2013, rewrote (a), which read “Subject to the insurer’s requirements as to payment of premium, each policy shall be mailed or delivered to the insured or to the person entitled to it within a reasonable period of time after its issuance, except where a condition required by the insurer has not been met by the insured.”; added (c), (d), and (e).

The 2016 amendment, effective October 16, 2016, in the introductory language of (c), substituted “an” for “a property and casualty” in two places and “endorsement” for “endorsements” in two places, in (c)(1), deleted “for property and casualty insurance” preceding “required”.

Sec. 21.42.260.
Renewal by certificate.

An insurance policy terminating by its terms at a specified expiration date and not otherwise renewable, may be renewed or extended at the option of the insurer upon a currently authorized policy form and at the premium rate then required for the policy, for a specific additional period or periods by certificate or by endorsement of the policy, without requiring the issuance of a new policy.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Collateral references. —

43 Am. Jur. 2d, Insurance, §§ 443 to 450.

44 C.J.S., Insurance, §§ 342 to 344, 347 to 351.

Sec. 21.42.265.
Effective date of coverage.

Unless otherwise provided by law, the effective date of a change relating to coverage under an insurance contract as a result of a change to this title is the issue date for a new policy or the renewal date for a renewal policy.

History.

(§ 42 ch 81 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.42.270.
Assignment of policies.

A policy may be assignable or nonassignable, depending upon its terms. Subject to its terms relating to its assignability, a life, group life, or health insurance policy, whether issued before or after July 1, 1966, under the terms of which the beneficiary may be changed upon the sole request of the insured, may be assigned either by pledge or transfer of title by an assignment executed by the insured alone and delivered to the insurer, whether or not the pledgee or assignee is the insurer. The assignment entitles the insurer to deal with the assignee as the owner or pledgee of the policy in accordance with the terms of the assignment until the insurer has received at its home office written notice of termination of the assignment or pledge, or written notice by or on behalf of some other person claiming an interest in the policy that is in conflict with the assignment.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 4 SLA 1986; am § 42 ch 56 SLA 1996)

Collateral references. —

43 Am. Jur. 2d, Insurance, § 784 et seq.

45 C.J.S., Insurance, §§ 730-760.

Validity of assignment of life insurance policy to one who has no insurable interest in insured. 30 A.L.R.2d 1310.